District of Columbia statutes.
8-1443

Costs recoverable by the District of Columbia.

Costs recoverable by the District of Columbia under § 8-1442 shall include all costs related to:

(1)

Containment of the gasses, explosives, and materials identified in § 8-1442;

(2)

Necessary cleanup and restoration of the site and the surrounding environment;

(3)

Removal of the gasses, explosives, and materials identified in § 8-1442;

(4)

Such actions as may be necessary to monitor, assess, and evaluate the release or threat of release of any of the gasses, explosives, and materials identified in § 8-1442, or to mitigate damage to the public health or welfare that may otherwise result from a release or threat of a release;

(5)

Natural resource damages;

(6)

Attorney’s fees and costs;

(7)

Reimbursement for private collection firm’s services, when used; and

(8)

Applicable interest on all costs and expenses incurred.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 303, 54 DCR 794

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1444.